Massachusetts, session 194th, H4037.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. Clause (iii) of subsection (b) of section 24 of chapter 10 of the General 
2 Laws, as appearing in section 7 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by adding 
3 the following words:- and allow any player to voluntarily place themself on the list of self-
4 excluded persons established by the Massachusetts gaming commission pursuant to subsection 
5 (f) of section 45 of chapter 23K, on the list of self-excluded persons established by the 
6 Massachusetts gaming commission pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of section 13 of 
7 chapter 23N, and on the list of self-excluded persons established by the attorney general pursuant 
8 to section 11M3/4 of chapter 12 at the same time and in the same manner in which they can 
9 voluntarily prohibit or otherwise exclude themself from purchasing a lottery ticket, game or 
10 share online, over the internet, through the use of a mobile application or through any other 
11 means. 

2 of 17 12  SECTION 2. Said section 24 of said chapter 10, as so appearing, is hereby further 
13 amended by adding the following 2 subsections:- 
14  (i) The commission shall include the standardized disclaimer, established pursuant to 
15 subsection (z) of section 3 of chapter 23K, in all its advertisements for lottery products.       
16  (j) The commission shall ensure that the lottery shall not market to persons on any 
17 excluded persons list in any form, including but not limited to marketing by mail, by app 
18 notifications, by digital ads or by ads contracted to display in other companies’ advertisements.  
19 The commission shall ensure that all technological means available, including but not limited to 
20 microtargeting via cookies, Internet Protocol addresses and other digital fingerprints, are used to 
21 prevent its ads from being served to individuals on any excluded persons list, established 
22 pursuant to this section. The commission shall promulgate regulations for the implementation of 
23 this subsection. 
24  SECTION 3. Chapter 12 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
25 section 11M1/2 the following section:- 
26  Section 11M3/4.  (a) The attorney general shall establish a list of self-excluded persons 
27 from fantasy contests, established pursuant to section 11M1/2.  A person may request such 
28 person’s name to be placed on the list of self-excluded persons by filing a statement with the 
29 attorney general acknowledging that the person is a problem gambler and by agreeing that, 
30 during any period of voluntary exclusion, the person shall not collect any winnings or recover 
31 any losses resulting from any fantasy contests, established pursuant to said section 11M1/2. The 
32 attorney general shall adopt further regulations for the self-excluded persons list including 
33 procedures for placement, removal and transmittal of such list to persons or entities that offer 

3 of 17 34 fantasy contests, established pursuant to said section 11M1/2. The attorney general may fine a 
35 person or entity that offers fantasy contests, established pursuant to said section 11M1/2, if the 
36 person or entity that offers fantasy contests knowingly or recklessly fails to exclude or eject from 
37 its premises any person placed on the list of self-excluded persons. 
38  (b) Persons or entities that offer fantasy contests, established pursuant to section 11M1/2, 
39 shall not market to persons on any excluded persons list and shall deny access to 
40 complimentaries, check cashing privileges, club programs and other similar benefits to persons 
41 on the self-excluded persons list.  Notwithstanding any other general or special law to the 
42 contrary, the self-excluded persons list shall not be open to public inspection. Nothing in this 
43 section, however, shall prohibit a person or entity that offers fantasy contests, established 
44 pursuant to said section 11M1/2, from disclosing the identity of persons on the self-excluded 
45 persons list under this section to affiliated persons or entities that offer fantasy contests in this 
46 commonwealth or other jurisdictions for the limited purpose of assisting in the proper 
47 administration of responsible gaming programs operated by affiliated persons or entities that 
48 offer fantasy contests, established pursuant to said section 11M1/2. 
49  (c) A person who is prohibited from participating in fantasy contests, established 
50 pursuant to section 11M1/2, shall not collect any winnings or recover losses arising as a result of 
51 prohibited fantasy contest winnings obtained by a person who is prohibited from fantasy 
52 contests, and such winnings shall be deposited into the Public Health Trust Fund, established 
53 pursuant to section 58 of chapter 23K.    
54  (d) The attorney general shall further allow an individual to voluntarily place themself on 
55 the list of self-excluded persons established by the Massachusetts gaming commission pursuant 

4 of 17 56 to subsection (f) of section 45 of chapter 23K, and to opt into the system created by the state 
57 lottery commission for any individual to voluntarily prohibit or otherwise exclude themself from 
58 purchasing a lottery ticket, game or share online, over the internet, through the use of a mobile 
59 application or through any other means, established pursuant to clause (iii) of subsection (b) of 
60 section 24 of chapter 10, at the same time and in the same manner in which they request to be 
61 added to the list of self-excluded list of persons, established pursuant to this section.  
62  (e) The attorney general shall establish regulations, pursuant to chapter 30A, and 
63 procedures to implement this section.   
64  (f) The Massachusetts gaming commission, established pursuant to section 3 of chapter 
65 23K, and the state lottery commission, established pursuant to section 24 of chapter 10, shall 
66 consider and develop recommendations pursuant to joining a national registry or program for 
67 voluntary self-exclusion.    
68  (g) Persons or entities that offer fantasy contests, established pursuant to section 11M1/2, 
69 shall not engage in marketing or advertising that: (i) occurs via traditional television broadcast or 
70 streaming platform during a broadcast of either a professional sport or athletic event, defined 
71 pursuant to section 3 of chapter 23N, or a sports event or sporting event, defined pursuant to said 
72 section 3 of said chapter 23N; (ii) markets to persons on any excluded persons list, established 
73 pursuant to this section, in any form, including but not limited to marketing by mail, by app 
74 notifications, by digital ads or by ads contracted to display in other companies’ advertisements; 
75 provided, that a person or entity that offers fantasy contests, established pursuant to section 
76 11M1/2, shall use all technological means available, including but not limited to microtargeting 
77 via cookies, Internet Protocol addresses and other digital fingerprints, to prevent their ads from 

5 of 17 78 being served to individuals on any excluded persons list, established pursuant to this section; 
79 provided further, that the attorney general shall promulgate regulations, pursuant to chapter 30A, 
80 including penalties for noncompliance, for the implementation of this section; (iii) is deemed by 
81 the attorney general to appeal to a person less than 21 years of age; or (iv) occurs via means of 
82 television, radio, internet, billboard or print publication unless at least 85 per cent of the audience 
83 is reasonably expected to be 21 years of age or older, as determined by reliable, up-to-date 
84 audience composition data.  The penalty for an infraction of this subsection shall be determined 
85 by the attorney general, pursuant to its power to promulgate regulations for the implementation, 
86 administration and enforcement of this chapter, in accordance with what the commission deems 
87 necessary to achieve compliance with this subsection. 
88  (h) Persons or entities that offer fantasy contests, established pursuant to section 11M1/2, 
89 shall include the standardized disclaimer, established pursuant to subsection (z) of section 3 of 
90 chapter 23K, in all advertising and marketing for all such fantasy contests.       
91  SECTION 4. Section 3 of chapter 23K of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
92 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:- 
93  (z) The commission, in consultation with the department of public health’s office of 
94 problem gambling services, the state lottery commission, established pursuant to section 23 of 
95 chapter 10 and the attorney general, shall establish a single standardized disclaimer that: (i) 
96 warns of the risks of gambling, sports betting and playing the lottery; (ii) contains a single phone 
97 number for the MA Gambling Helpline; and (iii) provides means to locate other resources made 
98 available by the state to help with problem gambling and gambling addiction.  The commission 

6 of 17 99 shall promulgate regulations, pursuant to chapter 30A, to require its licensees and its licensees’ 
100 contractors to use the standardized disclaimer in all advertising. 
101  SECTION 5. Said chapter 23K is hereby amended by striking out section 29 and 
102 inserting in place thereof the following section:- 
103  Section 29. (a) A gaming establishment offering a cashless wagering system shall allow 
104 individuals to monitor and impose betting limits and loss limits on their cashless wagering. The 
105 gaming establishment shall allow individuals to set betting limits and loss limits on their cashless 
106 wagering including, but not limited to, per bet limits, hourly limits, daily limits, weekly limits 
107 and monthly limits. An individual may lower limits and increase limits; provided, however, that 
108 the individual shall not increase betting limits more than once in a 24-hour period. 
109  (b) The gaming establishment shall issue to each patron who has been issued a rewards 
110 card or who participates in a cashless wagering system by the gaming establishment a monthly 
111 statement, mailed to the patron at the patron's physical mailing address, which shall include the 
112 patron's total bets, wins and losses; provided, however, that a patron shall be given the 
113 opportunity to decline receiving a monthly statement at the time the rewards card is issued or 
114 during initial participation in a cashless wagering system; provided further, that a patron may 
115 later opt out of receiving monthly statements by providing a written request to cease monthly 
116 statements to the gaming establishment. 
117  (c) The gaming establishment shall issue to each patron who has been issued a rewards 
118 card or who participates in a cashless wagering system by the gaming establishment an electronic 
119 daily statement, sent to their email address collected when the rewards card was issued or when 
120 the player was enrolled in cashless wagering system, and sent to their smartphone via 

7 of 17 121 notification from the gaming establishment’s app if downloaded by the patron, with the default 
122 setting of the app set to allow this notification; this electronic statement shall include the patron's 
123 total bets, wins and losses; provided however, that a patron shall be given the opportunity to 
124 decline to receive the electronic daily statement by email or turn off the notification at the time 
125 the rewards card is issued or during initial participation in a cashless wagering system; provided 
126 further, that a patron may later opt out of receiving the electronic weekly statement by email 
127 through use of a link to unsubscribe from the statement in the email, and that a patron may also 
128 later turn off the daily statement notification from the gaming establishment’s app. 
129  (d) A gaming licensee who has implemented such a program or system shall annually 
130 report to the commission the amount of money spent and lost by patrons who have been issued a 
131 rewards card or who participated in a cashless wagering system, aggregated by zip code. Activity 
132 under this section shall be monitored by the commission. Individuals on the list of excluded 
133 persons shall not be permitted to participate in a cashless wagering system. 
134  (e) A gaming establishment shall ask each patron who has been issued a rewards card or 
135 who participates in a cashless wagering system by the gaming establishment at the time they are 
136 issued the rewards card or enrolled in the cashless wagering system to set a spending limit for a 
137 daily, weekly or monthly basis and enroll in a play management program approved by the 
138 commission, including but not limited to Play-My-Way, or to opt-out of such a play management 
139 program. 
140  (f) A gaming establishment shall issue to each patron who has been issued a rewards card 
141 or who participates in a cashless wagering system by the gaming establishment a hard, paper 
142 copy of a brochure that contains all information and resources made available by the state and 

8 of 17 143 the commission to help with problem gambling, including but not limited to Gamesense, 
144 PlayMyWay, and Voluntary Self-Exclusion.     
145  SECTION 6. Subsection (f) of section 45 of said chapter 23K, as appearing in the 2022 
146 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the third sentence the following 3 
147 sentences:- The commission shall allow any individual to opt into the system created by the state 
148 lottery commission for any individual to voluntarily prohibit or otherwise exclude themself from 
149 purchasing a lottery ticket, game or share online, over the internet, through the use of a mobile 
150 application or through any other means, established pursuant to clause (iii) of subsection (b) of 
151 section 24 of chapter 10, at the same time and in the same manner in which they request to be 
152 added to the list of self-excluded list of persons, established pursuant to this section.  The 
153 commission shall further allow any individual to place themself on the list of self-excluded 
154 persons established by the attorney general pursuant to section 11M3/4 of chapter 12 at the same 
155 time and in the same manner in which they request to be added to the list of self-excluded list of 
156 persons, established pursuant to this section. The commission shall provide for an online method 
157 and a phone method, in addition to any other method it finds reasonable and necessary, for 
158 persons to place themselves on the list of self-excluded persons. 
159  SECTION 7. Said section 45 of said chapter 23K, as so appearing, is hereby further 
160 amended by striking out subsection (g) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:- 
161  (g) Gaming establishments shall not market to persons on any excluded persons list, 
162 established pursuant to this section, in any form, including but not limited to marketing by mail, 
163 by app notifications, by digital ads or by ads contracted to display in other companies’ 
164 advertisements.  Gaming establishments shall use all technological means available, including 

9 of 17 165 but not limited to microtargeting via cookies, Internet Protocol addresses and other digital 
166 fingerprints, to prevent their ads from being served to individuals on any excluded persons list, 
167 established pursuant to this section.  Gaming establishments shall deny access to 
168 complimentaries, check cashing privileges, club programs and other similar benefits to persons 
169 on the self-excluded persons list.  The Massachusetts gaming commission shall promulgate 
170 regulations, pursuant to chapter 30A, including penalties for noncompliance, for the 
171 implementation of this section.   
172  SECTION 8. Said section 45 of said chapter 23K, as so appearing, is hereby further 
173 amended by adding the following subsection:-  
174  (l) Gaming establishments shall check identification for all individuals seeking entrance 
175 to the gaming floor of the gaming establishment for the purpose of excluding those individuals 
176 pursuant to the exclusion and self-exclusion provisions of this section.  
177  SECTION 9.  Section 58 of said chapter 23K, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
178 adding the following sentence:- Annually, the department of public health shall submit to the 
179 speaker of the house, the president of the senate, the joint committee on public health and the 
180 joint committee on economic development and emerging technologies a report on its treatment 
181 programs funded by the fund, including but not limited to: (i) the treatment programs funded by 
182 the fund and the amounts they receive; (ii) the number of individuals served by each treatment 
183 program funded by the fund, including whether they are new clients or continuing clients in the 
184 programs; (iii) demographic information of those served by treatment programs funded by the 
185 fund, including but not limited to the variables of sex, age, race, ethnicity, income, education and 

10 of 17 186 geography; and (iv) the outcomes obtained for individuals enrolled in treatment programs funded 
187 by the fund.   
188  SECTION 10.  Said chapter 23K is hereby further amended by striking out section 61 and 
189 inserting in place thereof the following section:-  
190  Section 61. (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a 
191 separate fund to be known as the Community Mitigation Fund. The fund shall consist of monies 
192 transferred under section 59 and all other monies credited or transferred to the fund from any 
193 other fund or source. 
194  (b) The commission shall administer the fund and, without further appropriation, shall 
195 expend monies in the fund to assist the host community and surrounding communities including, 
196 but not limited to, communities that are directly adjacent to a host community and other 
197 communities that have been designated surrounding communities by the commission or 
198 licensees, in offsetting costs related to the construction and operation of a gaming establishment 
199 including, but not limited to, water and sewer districts in the vicinity of a gaming establishment, 
200 local and regional education, transportation, infrastructure, housing, environmental and public 
201 safety agencies, including the office of the county district attorney, police, fire and emergency 
202 services. The commission may, at its discretion, distribute funds to a governmental entity or 
203 district other than a single municipality in order to implement a mitigation measure that affects 
204 more than 1 municipality; provided, however, that such entity or district shall submit a written 
205 request for funding in the same manner as a municipality would be required to submit such a 
206 request under subsection (c). 

11 of 17 207  (c) Parties requesting appropriations from the fund shall submit a written request for 
208 funding to the commission by a date established by the commission. The commission may hold a 
209 public hearing in the region of a gaming establishment to provide parties with the opportunity to 
210 provide further information about their request for funds and shall distribute funds to requesting 
211 parties based on the determination of the commission. The commission may promulgate 
212 regulations for the implementation of this section including establishing eligibility criteria and 
213 purposes for which funds may be distributed. The commission may assess a fee for the 
214 administration of this section. 
215  SECTION 11. Said chapter 23K is hereby amended by adding the following section:- 
216  Section 72. (a) A licensee under chapter 23K or chapter 23N shall not engage in 
217 advertising, marketing or branding, or enter into contracts to create brand sponsorships or 
218 celebrity endorsements, that are deemed by the commission to appeal to a person less than 21 
219 years of age. A licensee under chapter 23K or chapter 23N shall not engage in advertising, 
220 marketing and branding by means of television, radio, internet, billboard or print publication 
221 unless at least 85 per cent of the audience is reasonably expected to be 21 years of age or older, 
222 as determined by reliable, up-to-date audience composition data.  The penalty for an infraction of 
223 this subsection shall be determined by the commission, pursuant to its power to promulgate 
224 regulations for the implementation, administration and enforcement of this chapter, in 
225 accordance with what the commission deems necessary to achieve compliance with this 
226 subsection.  
227  (b) The commission shall establish an excise tax of 5 per cent on any income generated 
228 by an individual celebrity through a contract with a licensee under chapter 23K or chapter 23N to 

12 of 17 229 participate in advertising, marketing, branding, brand sponsorships or celebrity endorsements. 
230 The revenue from this subsection shall be deposited into the Public Health Trust Fund, 
231 established pursuant to section 58.  
232  SECTION 12. Section 4 of chapter 23N of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
233 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 22, the word “and”. 
234  SECTION 13. Said section 4 of said chapter 23N, as so appearing, is hereby further 
235 amended by inserting, in line 24, after the word “law” the following words:- ; and (F) advertising 
236 via traditional television broadcast or streaming platform during such a broadcast of either a 
237 professional sport or athletic event, defined pursuant to section 3, or a sports event or sporting 
238 event, defined pursuant to section 3.   
239  SECTION 14. Subsection (d) of said section 4 of said chapter 23N, as so appearing, is 
240 hereby further amended by adding the following paragraph:- 
241  (4) (i) Notwithstanding any general or special law or rule or regulation to the contrary, a 
242 sports wagering operator shall supply the commission with customer tracking data collected or 
243 generated by loyalty programs, player tracking software, player card systems, online gambling 
244 transactions or any other information system. Not later than December 31, 2025, the commission 
245 shall contract with an experienced nonprofit research entity to develop an anonymizing system 
246 that automatically removes from the data: (A) personally identifying information, including 
247 player name, street address, bank or credit information and the last 4 digits of a player’s ZIP+4 
248 code, in compliance with section 2 of chapter 93H; and (B) game identifying information, 
249 including game name and device manufacturing company, in protection of corporate intellectual 
250 property. The data shall retain information on player characteristics including, but not limited to, 

13 of 17 251 gender, age and region of residence, player behavior including, but not limited to, frequency of 
252 play, length of play, speed of play, denomination of play, amounts wagered and, if applicable, 
253 number of lines or hands played and characteristics of games played including, but not limited 
254 to, reel configuration, return-to-player or RTP, volatility index and denomination. The 
255 commission shall convey the anonymized data to a research facility, which shall make the data 
256 available to qualified researchers for the purposes of: (1) conducting analyses that improve 
257 understanding of how gambling addiction develops and progresses; (2) developing evidence-
258 based harm minimization strategies; and (3) developing evidence-based systems to monitor, 
259 detect and intervene in high-risk gambling. The commission shall request reports on research 
260 analyses of the behavioral data, which could provide informed recommendation to the general 
261 court relative to more effective regulation of gambling operations. The commission may directly 
262 initiate studies assessing the effectiveness of any specific measures, programs or interventions 
263 that the commonwealth has implemented in gaming operations and which might be illuminated 
264 through the behavioral data in question.  
265  (ii) The commission shall make a concerted, good faith effort to implement such 
266 evidence-based harm minimization strategies and evidence-based systems to monitor, detect and 
267 intervene in high-risk gambling, and to act on the recommendations made in reports and studies 
268 produced pursuant to this section.  The commission shall also deliver all such reports, studies and 
269 recommendations to the joint committee on economic development and emerging technologies.     
270  SECTION 15. Section 6 of said chapter 23N, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
271 striking out subsection (i) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:- 

14 of 17 272  (i) Applications for operator licenses are public records under section 10 of chapter 66; 
273 provided, however, that trade secrets, competitively sensitive information or other proprietary 
274 information provided to the commission under this chapter, the disclosure of which would place 
275 the applicant or licensee at a competitive disadvantage or would be detrimental to the applicant 
276 or licensee if it were made public, may be withheld from disclosure under said section 10 of said 
277 chapter 66 at the commission's discretion. 
278  SECTION 16. Section 12 of said chapter 23N, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
279 adding the following 2 subsections:- 
280  (h) (1) A sports wagering operator or qualified gaming entity shall allow individuals to 
281 monitor and impose betting limits and loss limits on their wagers. The operator or qualified 
282 gaming entity shall allow individuals to set betting limits on their sports wagers including, but 
283 not limited to, per bet limits, hourly limits, daily limits, weekly limits and monthly limits. An 
284 individual may lower limits and increase limits; provided, however, that the individual shall not 
285 increase betting limits more than once in a 24-hour period.  The operator or qualified gaming 
286 entity shall ask individuals at the time that they first register and create an account on the 
287 platform for the purpose of making wagers to set a spending limit and a loss limit for a daily, 
288 weekly or monthly basis and enroll in a play management program approved by the commission, 
289 including but not limited to Play-My-Way, or to opt out of such a play management program.  
290  (2) The operator or qualified gaming entity shall issue to each patron who has been issued 
291 a rewards card or who participates in a cashless wagering system by the gaming establishment a 
292 monthly statement, mailed to the patron at the patron's physical mailing address, which shall 
293 include the patron's total bets, wins and losses; provided, however, that a patron shall be given 

15 of 17 294 the opportunity to decline receiving a monthly statement at the time the rewards card is issued or 
295 during initial participation in a cashless wagering system; provided further, that a patron may 
296 later opt out of receiving monthly statements by providing a written request to cease monthly 
297 statements to the operator or qualified gaming entity. 
298  (3) The operator or qualified gaming entity shall issue to each patron who has been issued 
299 a rewards card or who participates in a cashless wagering system by the operator or qualified 
300 gaming entity an electronic daily statement, sent to their email address, collected when the 
301 rewards card was issued or when the player was enrolled in cashless wagering system, and sent 
302 to their smartphone via notification from the operator’s or qualified gaming entity’s app if 
303 downloaded by the patron.  The operator or qualified gaming entity shall ensure the default 
304 setting of the app allows notification of the electronic daily statement.  The electronic daily 
305 statement shall include the patron's total bets, wins and losses.  The operator or qualified gaming 
306 entity shall allow a patron the opportunity to: (i) decline to receive the electronic daily statement 
307 by email or turn off the notification at the time the rewards card is issued or during initial 
308 participation in a cashless wagering system; (ii) opt out of receiving the electronic daily 
309 statement by email through use of a link to unsubscribe from the statement in the email; and (iii) 
310 turn off the daily statement notification from the operator’s or qualified gaming entity’s app.  
311  (4) An operator or qualified gaming entity licensed pursuant to this chapter that has 
312 implemented such a program or system shall annually report to the commission the amount of 
313 money spent and lost by patrons who have been issued a rewards card or who participated in a 
314 cashless wagering system, aggregated by zip code. Activity under this section shall be monitored 
315 by the commission. Individuals on the list of excluded persons shall not be permitted to 
316 participate in a cashless wagering system.  Furthermore, an operator or qualified gaming entity 

16 of 17 317 shall issue to each patron who has been issued a rewards card or who participates in a cashless 
318 wagering system by the operator or qualified gaming entity a hard, paper copy of a brochure that 
319 contains all information and resources made available by the state and the commission to help 
320 with problem gambling, including but not limited to Gamesense, PlayMyWay, and Voluntary 
321 Self-Exclusion.  
322  (i) A licensee under this chapter shall not exclude any individual from its platform or 
323 limit the wagers or potential winnings of any individual except when based on: (i) a section of 
324 this chapter; or (ii) a preexisting term of service of the licensee that is clearly disclosed to the 
325 individual upon logging into the app of the licensee.  
326  SECTION 17. Paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of section 13 of said chapter 23N, as so 
327 appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after the second sentence the following sentence:- The 
328 commission shall provide for an online method and a phone method, in addition to any other 
329 method it finds reasonable and necessary, for persons to place themselves on the list of self-
330 excluded persons. 
331  SECTION 18. Said subsection (e) of said section 13 of said chapter 23N, as so appearing, 
332 is hereby further amended by adding the following paragraph:- 
333  (4) A sports wagering operator or qualified gaming entity shall not market to persons on 
334 any excluded persons list in any form, including but not limited to marketing by mail, by app 
335 notifications, by digital ads or by ads contracted to display in other companies’ advertisements.  
336 A sports wagering operator or qualified gaming entity shall use all technological means 
337 available, including but not limited to microtargeting via cookies, Internet Protocol addresses and 
338 other digital fingerprints, to prevent their ads from being served to individuals on any excluded 

17 of 17 339 persons list, established pursuant to this section.  The commission shall promulgate regulations, 
340 pursuant to chapter 30A, including penalties for noncompliance, for the implementation of this 
341 section. 
342  SECTION 19. Section 16 of said chapter 23N, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
343 adding the following subsection:- 
344  (j) To further effectuate the purposes of this chapter with respect to the investigation and 
345 enforcement of sports wagering operators and qualified gaming entities, the investigations and 
346 enforcement bureau in the commission may obtain or provide pertinent information regarding 
347 applicants or licensees from or to law enforcement entities or gaming authorities or sports 
348 wagering regulatory authorities and other domestic, federal or foreign jurisdictions, including the 
349 Federal Bureau of Investigation, and may transmit such information to each other electronically.